District of Columbia statutes.
26-1401.16

Liquidation of universal banks in general.

A universal bank shall not be liquidated except as provided by this chapter or in accordance with the order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 216, 48 DCR 3244

History